Tennessee, session 114, SB1148.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 55-10-428(c), is amended by
deleting the language "December 1, 2025" and substituting instead the language "February 1,
2026".
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1148
002895
- 1 -